Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Supplement, 201748-645
Benefits; waiver, release, and deductions void; discrimination in hire or tenure unlawful; penalty.

(1) Any agreement by an individual to waive, release, or commute his or her rights to benefits or any other rights under the Employment Security Law shall be void.

(2) Any agreement by an individual in the employ of any person or concern to pay all or any portion of an employer's contributions required under such law from such employer, shall be void.

(3) No employer shall:

(a) Directly or indirectly make, require, or accept any deduction from wages to finance the employer's contributions required from him or her;

(b) Require or accept any waiver of any right hereunder by any individual in his or her employ;

(c) Discriminate in regard to the hiring, rehiring, or tenure of work of any individual on account of any claim made by such individual for benefits under the Employment Security Law; or

(d) Obstruct or impede the filing of claims for benefits in any manner.

(4) Any employer, officer, or agent of an employer who violates any provision of this section shall be guilty of a Class II misdemeanor.

Laws 1937, c. 108, § 15, p. 399;

Laws 1941, c. 94, § 11, p. 399;

C.S.Supp.,1941, § 48-714;

R.S.1943, § 48-645;

Laws 1977, LB 40, § 292;

Laws 1985, LB 339, § 30;

Laws 2017, LB172, § 59.
January 1, 2018